Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.030

Contracts, combinations, conspiracies in restraint of trade declared unlawful.

Every contract, combination, in the form of trust or otherwise, or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce is hereby declared unlawful.

[ 1961 c 216 s 3.]

NOTES:

Monopolies and trusts prohibited: State Constitution Art. 12 s 22.